Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Air Quality

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61B Am. Jur. 2d Pollution Control §§ 149 to 717.

Validity of state and local air pollution administrative rules, 74 ALR4th 566.

Private contractor as “authorized representative” of administrator of environmental protection agency for purpose of inspections conducted under § 114 of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7414), 72 ALR Fed 176.

Control of interstate pollution under Clean Air Act as amended in 1977 (42 USC §§ 7401-7626), 82 ALR Fed 316.

Application of air quality modeling to decisionmaking under Clean Air Act (42 USC §§ 7401-7426), 84 ALR Fed 710.

Standing of air pollution source to challenge Clean Air Act ( 42 USC §§ 7401 — 7626) or its implementation,
85 ALR Fed 515.

Application of § 165 of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7475), pertaining to preconstruction requirement for prevention of significant deterioration, to particular emission sources, 86 ALR Fed 255.

Clean Air Act implementation plans for nonattainment areas, 90 ALR Fed 481.

What constitutes modification of stationary source, under § 111 (a)(3), (4) of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7411 (a)(3), (4)), so as to subject source to environmental protection agency's new source performance standards, 94 ALR Fed 750.

Conformity requirements of § 176(c) of Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7506(c), 157 ALR Fed 217.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment §§ 130, 133 to 157.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-201.
Discharge or emission of contaminants; restrictions.

No person shall cause, threaten or allow the discharge or emission of any air contaminant in any form so as to cause pollution which violates rules, regulations and standards adopted by the council.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.16; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Emissions Outside Routine Operations. —

In determining a proposed facility's potential to emit sulfur dioxide, emissions from cold starts and malfunctions did not have to be considered because they were not routine operations; moreover, they would be regulated as excess emissions if they exceeded the limit in the air quality permit.
Sierra Club v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2011 WY 42, 251 P.3d 310,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

Powder River Basin Res. Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 25, 226 P.3d 809,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Mar. 5, 2010).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For comment on air quality provisions of the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act of 1973, see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 69 (1974).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Pre-emption, by provisions of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7401 et seq.), of federal common law of nuisance in area of air pollution, 61 ALR Fed 859.

§ 35-11-202.
Establishment of standards.

Without limiting the authority of the administrator as set out in W.S.

35-11-110

, he shall, after consultation with the advisory board, recommend to the director such ambient air standards or emission control requirements by rule or regulation, as may be necessary to prevent, abate, or control pollution. Such standards or requirements may be for the state as a whole or may vary from area to area, as may be appropriate to facilitate accomplishment of the purposes of this act, and in order to take account of varying local conditions.

In recommending such standards or requirements the administrator shall:

Consider all the facts and circumstances bearing upon the reasonableness of the emissions involved, including:

The character and degree of injury to, or interference with the health and physical well being of the people, animals, wildlife and plant life;

The social and economic value of the source of pollution;

The priority of location in the area involved;

The technical practicability and economic reasonableness of reducing or eliminating the pollution; and

The social welfare and aesthetic value.

Grant such time as he shall find to be reasonable and necessary for owners and operators of air contaminant sources to comply with applicable standards or requirements;

Recommend to the director, after consultation with the advisory board, regulations to prevent construction, modification or operation of any source at any location where emissions from such source will prevent the attainment or maintenance of a state or national standard.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.17; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 198, § 2; 1994, ch. 61, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xii).

Consideration of factors in section not mandatory. —

The council does not act contrary to law in failing to consider the factors set forth in this section. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Pre-emption, by provisions of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7401 et seq.), of federal common law of nuisance in area of air pollution, 61 ALR Fed 859.

Environmental protection agency's classifications of air quality control regions under § 107(d)(2) of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7407(d)(2)), 75 ALR Fed 328.

§ 35-11-203.
Sources subject to operating permit program.

The following sources of air contaminants are subject to the provisions of W.S.

35-11-203

through

35-11-212

:

Any stationary source, or any group of stationary sources located within a contiguous area and under common control, that:

Has the potential to emit one hundred (100) tons or more per year of any pollutant regulated under the Clean Air Act and is a major stationary source as defined in section 302 of the Clean Air Act;

Has the potential to emit ten (10) tons per year of any single hazardous air pollutant or twenty-five (25) tons per year of any combination of hazardous air pollutants as defined by section 112 of the Clean Air Act. Emissions from any oil or gas exploration or production well (with its associated equipment) and emissions from any pipeline compressor or pump station shall not be aggregated with emissions from other similar units, whether or not such units are in a contiguous area or under common control, to determine whether such units or stations are major sources; or

Is subject to the nonattainment area provisions of title I, part D, of the Clean Air Act.

Any other source of hazardous air pollutants, including an area source, which the environmental protection agency may designate pursuant to the provisions of section 112 of the Clean Air Act;

Any source subject to the new source performance standards promulgated by the environmental protection agency pursuant to section 111 of the Clean Air Act;

Any “affected source” subject to the acid rain provisions of title IV of the Clean Air Act as defined in section 501 of the Clean Air Act;

Any source subject to preconstruction review permits pursuant to the prevention of significant deterioration regulations promulgated by the environmental protection agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act;

Any other stationary source that the environmental protection agency may designate by regulation pursuant to authority granted under the Clean Air Act.

After the effective date of the operating permit program authorized under W.S.

35-11-203

through

35-11-212

, it shall be unlawful for any person to violate any requirement of a permit issued under the operating permit program or to operate any source required to have a permit under this section, without having complied with the provisions of the operating permit program.

The department shall exempt any nonmajor source from the obligation to obtain a permit under this section until the environmental protection agency requires such sources to obtain an operating permit in final regulations promulgated pursuant to title V of the Clean Air Act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1; 1994, ch. 11, § 1.

Clean Air Act. —

For the definition of the federal “Clean Air Act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(b)(iii) and notes thereto. Title I, part D of the act appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7501 et seq. Title IV of the act appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7651 et seq. Title V of the act appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq. Sections 111, 112, 302 and 501 of the act appear as 42 U.S.C. §§ 7411, 7412, 7602 and 7661, respectively.

§ 35-11-204.
Department to establish requirements for applications; certification.

The department shall promulgate rules for permit applications, including standard application forms to be submitted pursuant to the operating permit program. The rules shall:

Establish specific criteria for defining a complete permit application, including information which identifies a source, its applicable air pollution control requirements, current compliance status, intended operating regime and emissions levels;

Provide for adequate, streamlined and reasonable procedures for determining when an application is complete and for processing an application; and

Provide for public notice of the application, and opportunity for public comment and public hearings.

The application, including any information required to be submitted with the application pursuant to this section shall be signed by a responsible official who shall certify the accuracy of the information.

Operating permit applications are not required until after the date that the environmental protection agency has issued approval of the state’s permit program, or by November 15, 1995, whichever comes first.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1.

§ 35-11-205.
Application procedures.

Any source required to have a permit under W.S.

35-11-203

shall, not later than twelve (12) months after the date on which the source becomes subject to the requirements of the operating permit program or such earlier date as the department may establish, submit to the department a compliance plan and an application for a permit signed by a responsible official, who shall certify the accuracy of the information submitted. The department shall approve or disapprove a completed application, consistent with the procedures established under W.S.

35-11-204

for consideration of such applications, and shall issue or deny the permit, within eighteen (18) months after the date of receipt thereof, except that the department shall establish a phased schedule for acting on permit applications submitted within the first full year after the effective date of the operating permit program, or a partial or interim program. Any such schedule shall assure that at least one-third (1/3) of the permits will be acted on by the department annually over a period of not to exceed three (3) years after the effective date. The department shall establish reasonable procedures to prioritize approval or disapproval actions in the case of applications for construction or modification under the applicable requirements of the Clean Air Act and this article.

Any source submitting a permit application shall submit with the application a compliance plan describing how the source will comply with all applicable requirements under this article and the Clean Air Act. The compliance plan shall include a schedule of compliance, and a schedule under which the permittee will submit progress reports to the department no less frequently than every six (6) months.

Except for sources required to have a permit before construction or modification under the applicable requirements of this article or the Clean Air Act, if an applicant has submitted a timely and complete application for a permit or a renewal of a permit required by the operating permit program, but final action has not been taken on the application, the source’s failure to have a permit shall not be a violation of W.S.

35-11-203

, unless the delay in final action was due to the failure of the applicant to timely submit information required or requested to process the application. No source required to have a permit under the operating permit program shall be in violation of W.S.

35-11-203

before the date on which the source is required to submit an application under subsection (a) of this section.

A copy of each permit application, compliance plan, schedule of compliance, emissions or compliance monitoring report, certification, and each permit issued under the operating permit program, shall be available to the public. If an applicant or permittee is required to submit information entitled to protection from disclosure under section 114(c) of the Clean Air Act, W.S. 35-11-1101(a) or 16-4-203(d)(v), the applicant or permittee may submit the information separately. The requirements of section 114(c), W.S. 35-11-1101(a) and 16-4-203(d)(v) shall apply to the information. The contents of a permit shall not be entitled to protection under section 114(c), W.S. 35-11-1101(a) or 16-4-203(d)(v).

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1.

Clean Air Act. —

For the definition of the federal “Clean Air Act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(b)(iii) and notes thereto. Section 114(c) of the act, referred to throughout subsection (d), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7414(c).

§ 35-11-206.
Operating permit requirements and conditions.

Every permit issued under the operating permit program shall include enforceable emission limitations and standards, a schedule of compliance, a requirement that the permittee submit to the department no less often than every six (6) months, the results of any required monitoring, and other conditions as are necessary to assure compliance with applicable requirements established pursuant to this article and the Clean Air Act.

The department may by rule prescribe procedures and methods for determining compliance and for monitoring and analysis of pollutants regulated under the Clean Air Act and this article, but continuous emissions monitoring need not be required if alternative methods are available that provide sufficiently reliable and timely information for determining compliance. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect any continuous emissions monitoring requirement of title IV of the Clean Air Act, or where required elsewhere in the Clean Air Act.

Every permit issued under the operating permit program shall set forth inspection, entry, monitoring, compliance certification and reporting requirements to assure compliance with the permit terms and conditions. Monitoring and reporting requirements shall conform to any applicable regulation under subsection (b) of this section. Any report required to be submitted by a permit issued to a corporation under the operating permit program shall be signed by a responsible corporate official, who shall certify its accuracy.

The department may, after notice and opportunity for public hearing, issue a general permit covering numerous similar sources. Any general permit shall comply with all requirements applicable to permits under title V of the Clean Air Act and the operating permit program. No source covered by a general permit shall thereby be relieved from the obligation to file an application under W.S.

35-11-205

.

The department may issue a single permit authorizing emissions from similar operations at multiple temporary locations. No such permit shall be issued unless it includes conditions that will assure compliance with all the requirements of the operating permit program and the Clean Air Act at all authorized locations, including, but not limited to, ambient standards and compliance with any applicable increment or visibility requirements under part C of title I of the Clean Air Act. Any such permit shall in addition require the owner or operator to notify the department in advance of each change in location. The department may require a separate permit fee for operations at each location.

Every permit issued pursuant to the operating permit program shall:

Be issued for a fixed term of five (5) years unless the department makes a finding, after public comment and hearing, and based on substantial evidence in the record, that an operating permit term of less than five (5) years is necessary to protect the public health and the environment except that operating permits to any affected source as defined in section 501 of the Clean Air Act shall be issued for no less and no more than five (5) years;

Be subject to termination, modification, revocation or reissuance for cause;

Allow for operational flexibility at the permitted facility without revising the permit; and

Be subject to revision by the department to incorporate applicable requirements under the Clean Air Act and this article which are promulgated after the permit is issued if the remaining term of the permit is for a term of three (3) or more years. Any revision required by this paragraph shall be acted on by the department within the time limits provided in W.S. 35-11-205(a).

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1.

Clean Air Act. —

For the definition of the federal “Clean Air Act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(b)(iii) and notes thereto. Title IV of the act, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (b), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7651 et seq. Title V of the act, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (d), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq. Part C of title I of the act, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (e), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7470 et seq. Section 501 of the act, referred to in subsection (f)(i), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661.

§ 35-11-207.
Notification to the environmental protection agency and contiguous states.

The department shall transmit to the environmental protection agency:

A copy of each permit application and any application for a permit modification or renewal or any portion thereof including any compliance plan, as the environmental protection agency may require to effectively review the application and otherwise carry out its responsibilities under the Clean Air Act; and

A copy of each permit proposed to be issued and issued as a final permit.

The department shall provide notice of each permit application or proposed permit forwarded to the environmental protection agency under this section, to all states:

Whose air quality may be affected and that are contiguous to this state; or

That are within fifty (50) miles of the source.

The department shall provide an opportunity for states notified pursuant to subsection (b) of this section to submit written recommendations respecting the issuance of the permit and its terms and conditions. If any part of those recommendations are not accepted by the department it shall notify the state submitting the recommendations and the environmental protection agency in writing of its failure to accept those recommendations and the reasons therefor.

Upon receipt of timely objection by the environmental protection agency under title V of the Clean Air Act the department shall not issue any permit under the operating permit program unless it is revised and issued in accordance with section 505(c) of the Clean Air Act. Any permit issued under the operating permit program shall be subject to revocation or revision by the department throughout the period of time that EPA may object under title V of the Clean Air Act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1.

Clean Air Act. —

For the definition of the federal “Clean Air Act,” referred to in subsection (a)(i), see § 35-11-103(b)(iii) and notes thereto. Title V of the act, referred to in both sentences in subsection (d), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq. Section 505(c) of the act, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (d), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661d(c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Decisions of Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) approving or disapproving state implementation plans as interfering with primary role of states to determine how national ambient air quality standards should be met under Clean Air Act (42 USC §§ 7401 et seq.) 151 ALR Fed 495.

§ 35-11-208.
Review of actions on applications.

An applicant may seek relief pursuant to W.S.

35-11-802

on any final action taken on a permit including the director’s refusal to grant a permit under the operating permit program or failure to act on a completed application within eighteen (18) months.

Any person who participated in the public comment process on a permit application and who is aggrieved by any final action taken by the director on a permit application may seek relief pursuant to W.S.

35-11-1001

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1.

Evidence outside the record was properly considered. —

Evidence outside the record was properly considered by the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council with regard to the use of best available control technology in a proposed facility. The Council is not limited to reviewing the administrative record prior to issuing an air quality permit but instead conducts a contested case hearing at which all parties are afforded the opportunity to present new evidence.
Sierra Club v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2011 WY 42, 251 P.3d 310,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 35-11-209.
Small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program.

The department shall act as ombudsman for small business stationary sources in connection with implementation of the operating permit program and the Clean Air Act.

As ombudsman the department shall, in accordance with section 507 of the Clean Air Act, submit to the environmental protection agency plans for establishing a small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program.

The program shall be implemented by rules adopted by the department and shall contain:

Adequate mechanisms for developing, collecting and coordinating information concerning compliance methods and technologies for small business stationary sources, and programs to encourage lawful cooperation among such sources and other persons to further compliance with the Clean Air Act;

Adequate mechanisms for assisting small business stationary sources with pollution prevention and accidental release detection and prevention, including providing information concerning alternative technologies, process changes, products and methods of operation that help reduce air pollution;

A compliance assistance program for small business stationary sources which assists small business stationary sources in determining applicable requirements and in receiving permits under the operating permit program and the Clean Air Act in a timely and efficient manner;

Adequate mechanisms to assure that small business stationary sources receive notice of their rights under the Clean Air Act in a manner and form as to assure reasonably adequate time for such sources to evaluate compliance methods and any relevant or applicable proposed or final regulation or standard issued under the operating permit program or the Clean Air Act;

Adequate mechanisms for informing small business stationary sources of their obligations under the operating permit program and the Clean Air Act, including mechanisms for referring such sources to qualified auditors or, at the option of the state, for providing audits of the operations of such sources to determine compliance with the Clean Air Act;

Procedures for consideration of requests from a small business stationary source for modification of:

Any work practice or technological method of compliance; or

The schedule of milestones for implementing a work practice or method of compliance preceding any applicable compliance date, based on the technological and financial capability of the small business stationary source. No modification may be granted unless it is in compliance with the applicable requirements established pursuant to this article, the Clean Air Act, and the requirements of the operating permit program.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, for purposes of this section, “small business stationary source” means a stationary source that:

Is owned or operated by a person that employs one hundred (100) or fewer individuals;

Is a small business concern as defined in the Small Business Act [15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq.];

Is not a major stationary source as defined in W.S. 35-11-203(a)(i)(A);

Does not emit fifty (50) tons or more per year of any regulated pollutant; and

Emits less than seventy-five (75) tons per year of all regulated pollutants.

Upon petition by a source, the department may, after notice and opportunity for public comment, include as a small business stationary source for purposes of this section any stationary source which does not meet the criteria of paragraph (d)(iii), (iv) or (v) of this section but which does not emit more than one hundred (100) tons per year of all regulated pollutants.

The department, in consultation with the environmental protection agency and the administrator of the small business administration and after providing notice and opportunity for public hearing, may exclude from the small business stationary source definition under this section any category or subcategory of sources that the department determines to have sufficient technical and financial capabilities to meet the requirements of the Clean Air Act without the application of this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “paragraph” for “paragraphs” in (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Clean Air Act. —

For the definition of the federal “Clean Air Act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 35-11-103(b)(iii) and notes thereto. Section 507 of the act, referred to in subsection (b), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661f.

Small Business Act. —

The federal Small Business Act, referred to in subsection (d)(ii), appears as 15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides:

“[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 35-11-210.
Small business assistance program advisory panel.

There is created a compliance advisory panel consisting of the following nine (9) members:

Two (2) members, who are not owners, or representatives of owners, of small business stationary sources, shall be appointed by the governor to represent the general public;

Four (4) members shall be appointed by the legislature who are owners, or who represent owners of small business stationary sources. One (1) member each shall be appointed by the majority and minority leadership of the house of representatives and one (1) member each shall be appointed by the majority and minority leadership of the senate;

One (1) member shall be selected by the director of the department to represent the department;

Two (2) members who represent major source operators in the state of Wyoming, shall be appointed by the governor.

The panel shall:

Render advisory opinions concerning the effectiveness of the small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program, difficulties encountered, and degree and severity of enforcement;

Make periodic reports to the environmental protection agency required under title V of the Clean Air Act;

Review information for small business stationary sources to assure such information is understandable by the layperson; and

Have the small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program serve as the secretariat for the development and dissemination of such reports and advisory opinions.

Except for the initial members the panel members shall serve four (4) year terms and may be reappointed. The legislative members appointed from the house of representatives shall initially serve two (2) year terms. One (1) member appointed by the governor shall initially serve a three (3) year term. A vacancy occurs if a member ceases to meet the qualifications specified in subsection (a) of this section. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. The panel shall select from its members a chairman. The panel shall hold at least four (4) regularly scheduled meetings each year, and may hold special meetings as called by the chairman. Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business, but all decisions must be approved by a majority of the total membership of the panel. Each member, except the department representative, shall be reimbursed for per diem, mileage and expenses for attending panel meetings in the same manner and amount as state employees. The department representative shall suffer no loss of wages for the time devoted to the duties of the panel.

The panel shall be in addition to and operate separate from the advisory boards created pursuant to W.S.

35-11-113

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1.

Clean Air Act. —

Title V of the federal Clean Air Act, referred to in subsection (b)(ii), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq.

§ 35-11-211.
Fees.

The department shall implement a permit fee system and schedule of fees adequate to cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs of reviewing and acting upon any construction and modification permits under this article and developing, implementing and administering the operating permit program including the small business technical assistance program.

Permit fees shall be assessed against operators of sources applying for any permit under this article and annually thereafter for the duration of the permit. The fee for operating sources shall be based on the emissions of each regulated pollutant, as defined in section 502(b)(3)(B)(ii) of the Clean Air Act. The department shall exclude any amount of regulated pollutant emitted by any source in excess of four thousand (4,000) tons per year in determining the amount of fee required for any operating source. A fee shall be assessed upon applicants for construction and modification permits based on costs to the department in reviewing and acting upon those permit applications. The department shall develop a fee structure subject to the minimum amounts specified in subsection (j) of this section which equitably assesses the fees based on emissions for operating sources and projected costs of reviewing and acting upon construction and modification permits sufficient to recover the amount reviewed by the joint appropriations committee and appropriated by the legislature for implementing the operating permit program. The fee structure and appropriation shall be based upon measurable goals and approved by the joint appropriations committee prior to implementation. The department shall prepare a biennium report for review by the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee by October 31 of the year prior to the Wyoming legislative budget session. Permit fees shall cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs including the costs of:

Reviewing and acting upon any permit application including construction and modification permit applications;

Implementing and enforcing permits;

Emissions and ambient monitoring;

Preparing regulations and guidance;

Modeling analyses and demonstrations;

Preparing emission and source inventories and tracking emissions;

Permit-related functions performed by the department;

Development and administration of the state small business assistance program; and

Information management activities.

The fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a separate account, and shall be subject to appropriation by the legislature to the department solely for permitting construction and modification and for the development and administration of the construction, modification and operating permit programs.

The department shall give written notice of the amount of the fee to be assessed and the basis for the assessment to the operator of the source. The operator may appeal the assessment to the council within twenty (20) days after receipt of the written notice. The appeal shall be based only upon the allegation that the particular assessment is erroneous or excessive and may not be based upon the entire fee schedule adopted to fund the permitting programs. The contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall apply to any appeal under this subsection.

If any part of the assessment is not appealed it shall be paid to the department upon receipt of the written notice.

The department may reduce any fee required under the operating permit program to take into account the financial resources of small business stationary sources.

There shall be no double counting of the regulated emissions for the purpose of fee determination.

Fees under this section, for sources subject to the operating permit program as enumerated in W.S. 35-11-203(a), shall not be assessed for tailpipe emissions from any nonroad vehicle as defined under section 201 of the Clean Air Act.

The department shall charge the following minimum fees under this section:

Application . . . . . $500.00;

In addition to paragraph (i) of this subsection, review and acting on an application . . . . . $75.00 per hour;

Relocation of portable sources or facilities that are authorized to use self issuance permits . . . . . $150.00;

Relocation of portable sources or facilities not authorized to use self issuance permits . . . . . $300.00.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1; 1995, ch. 7, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to legislative sessions, see §

28-1-102

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "subject to the minimum amounts specified in subsection (j) of this section" in the fifth sentence of (b); and added (j).

Clean Air Act. —

Section 502(b)(3)(B)(ii) of the federal Clean Air Act, referred to in the second sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7661a(b)(3)(B)(ii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 83, § 2, effective July 1, 2002, provides that of the total appropriation to the air quality division, $5,443,333 is for operating permit program activities, and is to be the basis for the fee rate calculation under W.S.

35-11-211

. Of the total air quality division appropriation, $846,258 is for the new source review permit program. All costs associated with the new source review permit program permit review process are to be recovered by a permit review fee charged to applicants under W.S.

35-11-211

. Of this appropriation, $391,555 from the special revenue fund and two (2) positions for the voluntary clean-up program are to be terminated not later than June 30, 2004 and are not to be included in the agency's standard budget request for the budget period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-11-212.
Effect of other provisions.

Nothing in W.S.

35-11-203

through

35-11-212

shall be construed as affecting allowances under the allowance program and phase II compliance schedule under the acid rain provisions of title IV of the federal Clean Air Act [42 U.S.C. § 7651 et seq.].

Nothing in W.S.

35-11-203

through

35-11-212

shall be construed as affecting the department’s permitting or other regulation of the construction or modification of sources pursuant to W.S.

35-11-202

including rules in effect as of April 1, 1992 or subsequently promulgated under W.S.

35-11-202

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 70, § 1.

Clean Air Act. —

Title IV of the federal Clean Air Act, referred to in subsection (a), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 7651 et seq.